Massachusetts, session 194th, H33.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 32 is hereby amended by adding at the end of the
definition of “wages” the following paragraph:
Notwithstanding the foregoing, wages shall also include payments made by an employer
to an employee in supplementation of weekly incapacity payments under the provisions of
sections sixty-nine to seventy-five inclusive of chapter one hundred fifty-two, or of sections
thirty-four, thirty-four A, thirty-four B, thirty-five A, thirty-five F, thirty-six, until a retirement
allowance becomes effective for him under the provisions of sections one to twenty-eight
inclusive of this chapter. The extent to which these supplemental payments are considered wages
shall be limited, when combined with such incapacity payments, to the amount that in the
determination of the retirement board the member would have received during the applicable
time period, had they not been so incapacitated.
of 1